Utah statutes.
53A-2-111.   Legislative findings.
The Legislature finds that restructuring and consolidation of school districts
may provide long-term educational and financial benefits, but that short-term
costs and other problems may make it difficult for school officials to move
forward with such plans.  The Legislature therefore adopts Sections 53A-2-111
through 53A-2-116 to assist the public school system to create more efficient
and effective administrative units.
